Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
ARTICLE 20
TAXATION AND FINANCE

Cross references:

For public indebtedness, see article XI of the state constitution; for the constitutional provision that establishes limitations on spending, the imposition of taxes, and the incurring of debt, see § 20 of article X of the state constitution.

Section

PART 1 TAXATION AND ASSESSMENT
COLLECTION

PART 2 FINANCE - GENERAL

PART 3 FINANCE - TREASURER

PART 4 FINANCE - WARRANTS